Missouri, session 2026, HB3034.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 304.012, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 304.012, to read as follows:
304.012. 1. Every person operating a motor vehicle on the roads and highways of this
state shall drive the vehicle in a careful and prudent manner and at a rate of speed so as not to
endanger the property of another or the life or limb of any person and shall exercise the
highest degree of care.
2. Each motor vehicle operated on the roads and highways of this state shall
have present in the vehicle an appropriately endorsed driver who holds a valid driver's
license and who maintains the ability to actively control the vehicle at all times.
3. No person operating a motor vehicle on the roads and highways of this state shall
perform stunt driving, as such term is defined in section 304.145.
[3.] 4. Any person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a class B
misdemeanor, unless an accident is involved then it shall be a class A misdemeanor.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.